Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-824.03
Governing body; award of contract; considerations.

The governing body of the joint entity may let the contract for such work or materials to the responsible bidder who submits the lowest and best bid, or in the sole discretion of the governing body, all bids tendered may be rejected, and readvertisement for bids made, in the manner, form, and time as provided in section 13-824.02. In determining whether a bidder is responsible, the governing body may consider the bidder's financial responsibility, skill, experience, record of integrity, ability to furnish repairs and maintenance services, and ability to meet delivery or performance deadlines and whether the bid is in conformance with specifications. Consideration may also be given by the governing body of the joint entity to the relative quality of supplies and services to be provided, the adaptability of machinery, apparatus, supplies, or services to be purchased to the particular uses required, the preservation of uniformity, and the coordination of machinery and equipment with other machinery and equipment already installed. No such contract shall be valid nor shall any money of the joint entity be expended thereunder unless advertisement and letting has been had as provided in sections 13-824.01 to 13-824.03.

Laws 2007, LB636, § 4.